Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
354D

HAWAII
CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES

Section

354D-1 Finding and purpose

354D-2 Definitions

354D-3 Correctional industries program

354D-3.5 Annual report

354D-4 Powers and duties of the director

354D-5 Advisory committee

354D-6 Required programs

354D-7 Pricing

354D-8 Business operations; budget

354D-9 Rules

354D-10 Correctional industries revolving fund

354D-11 Provisions for qualified, able-bodied
inmates;

employment

354D-12 Training and employment by organization;
account

proceeds and wages

354D-13 Venture agreements

354D-14 Disclosure of interests

354D-15 Repealed

354D-16 Penalties

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next